Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216C.49] GEOTHERMAL HEAT EXCHANGE SYSTEM REBATE PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Eligible applicant" means a person, business, nonprofit, government entity, federally recognized Tribe in Minnesota, or religious institution that provides evidence to the commissioner's satisfaction demonstrating the applicant has received or has applied for a geothermal heat exchange system rebate available from the United States Department of Treasury under the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Public Law 117-189, for a commercial or multifamily building located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) "Geothermal heat exchange system" means a heating or cooling exchange device composed of a mechanism that collects or rejects heat from or to the underground. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A geothermal heat exchange system rebate program is established in the department to provide financial assistance to eligible applicants that install geothermal heat exchange technology in the applicant's building. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) An application for a rebate under this section must be made to the commissioner on a form developed by the commissioner. The application must be accompanied by documentation, as required by the commissioner, demonstrating: new text end new text begin (1) the applicant is an eligible applicant; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant owns the Minnesota building in which the geothermal heat exchange system is to be installed; new text end new text begin (3) an energy audit of the building in which the geothermal heat exchange system is to be installed was conducted by a person with a building analyst technician certification issued by the Building Performance Institute, Inc., or an equivalent certification, as determined by the commissioner, within the 18 months preceding the application date; new text end new text begin (4) the applicant installed a geothermal heat exchange system with the capacity recommended by the auditor or contractor, and the heat pump was installed by a contractor with sufficient training and experience in installing heat pumps, as determined by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (5) the total cost to install the geothermal heat exchange system in the applicant's building and the associated geothermal loop installed and located outside of the building. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must develop administrative procedures governing the application and rebate award processes. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may modify program requirements under this section when necessary to align with comparable federal programs administered by the department under the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022, Public Law 117-189. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Rebate amount. new text end new text begin A rebate awarded under this section must not exceed the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) 15 percent of geothermal heat exchange system costs, not to exceed $100,000 for a single project; or new text end new text begin (2) the total cost to purchase and install the heat exchange system in an eligible applicant's building, net of financial support received for the system from other federal, state, or utility programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prioritization. new text end new text begin When evaluating applications under this section, the commissioner must give priority to applications for multifamily housing or commercial buildings that: new text end new text begin (1) are owned by a nonprofit or government entity; and new text end new text begin (2) meet the definition of low-income rental property under section 273.128. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Account established. new text end new text begin (a) A geothermal heat exchange system rebate account is established as a separate account in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. The commissioner must credit appropriations and transfers to the account. Earnings, including interest, dividends, and any other earnings arising from assets of the account, must be credited to the account. Money remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year does not cancel and remains in the account until expended. The commissioner must manage the account. new text end new text begin (b) Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner to award rebates under this section and to reimburse the reasonable costs incurred by the department to administer this section. Money remaining in the account on January 1, 2033, cancels to the renewable development account. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for the geothermal heat exchange system rebate program under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.49. A rebate awarded with money appropriated under this paragraph must be awarded only to projects that are located within the electric service area of the public utility subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce for the geothermal heat exchange system rebate program under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.49. A rebate awarded with money appropriated under this paragraph must be awarded only to projects that are located outside the electric service area of the public utility subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779. new text end